Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.050

Entrance requirements exceeding minimum requirements.

Except as the legislature shall otherwise specifically direct, the boards of regents and the boards of trustees for the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College may establish entrance requirements for their respective institutions of higher education which meet or exceed the minimum entrance requirements established under *RCW 28B.76.290(2).

[ 2004 c 275 s 48; 1985 c 370 s 91; 1984 c 278 s 19; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 9; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.050. Prior: 1917 c 10 s 9; RRS s 4540. Formerly RCW 28.76.050.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28B.76.290 was repealed by 2012 c 229 s 120.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.

Severability—1984 c 278: See note following RCW 28A.185.010.

Effective date—1984 c 278: See note following RCW 28A.230.130.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.